Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-444
Plan of reorganization; territory included; state committee; procedure.

Territory included in a plan of reorganization adopted by the state committee shall remain a part of the plan until an election is held as provided in section 79-447. The state committee shall, within thirty days after holding the hearings provided for in section 79-442, notify the school districts whether or not it approves or disapproves such plan or plans.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 12, p. 677;

Laws 1951, c. 278, § 5, p. 940;

Laws 1959, c. 387, § 2, p. 1341;

Laws 1963, c. 479, § 7, p. 1541;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.12;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 193;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 19;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 47.

This section provides for submission of plan to state committee if authorized by a majority vote of county committee. Arends v. Whitten, 172 Neb. 297, 109 N.W.2d 363 (1961).

State committee has only advisory powers. School District No. 42 of Hitchcock County v. Marshall, 160 Neb. 832, 71 N.W.2d 549 (1955).

State committee reviews plan of reorganization. Nickel v. School Board of Axtell, 157 Neb. 813, 61 N.W.2d 566 (1953).